Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,169
Rules and regulations; governing boards; duties.

The governing boards of educational institutions shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations needed to carry out the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act. Governing boards of educational institutions, with the advice of staff, shall formulate activities and programs needed to carry out the act.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1089.